Utah statutes.
65A-1-9.   Application of Public Officers' and Employees' Ethics Act.

Council members and employees and agents of the division are subject to Title 67, Chapter 16, Public Officers' and Employees' Ethics Act.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

